Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.150

Title to property vests in state at death of owner.

Title to escheat property, which shall include any intangible personalty, shall vest in the state at the death of the owner thereof.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.08.150. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 3.]